Hawaii statutes.
[§328-12.4] Food establishments; use of latex gloves
prohibited. [Section effective January 1, 2017.] The use of latex
gloves by personnel in a food establishment permitted under title 11, chapter
50 of the Hawaii administrative rules, shall be prohibited. [L 2016, c 180,
§4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next